North Carolina, session 2025, HB726.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 9 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new Part to read:
"Part 10G. Commission on Youth Mentoring and Academic Enhancement.
"§ 143B-394.45. Commission on Youth Mentoring and Academic Enhancement.
(a) Creation and Duties. – There is established the North Carolina Commission on Youth
Mentoring and Academic Enhancement of the Department of Administration. The Commission
shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Establish a grant program for small- to medium-sized youth nonprofit
mentoring and tutoring organizations located in North Carolina with the
intended goals of (i) sustaining current and new community programs that are
effectively reaching high school students, (ii) reducing risk behavior factors,
specifically substance use disorders and gang involvement, and (iii) increasing
the number of positive adult and community connections for young people.
(2) Develop an application process for the program and inform mentoring
organizations how to apply.
(3) Work with the North Carolina Department of Public Instruction and public
school districts across all 100 North Carolina counties to identify at-risk
students and schools.
(4) Consult with the Council for Women and Youth Involvement as needed.
(b) Membership. – The Commission shall consist of 12 members appointed by the
Governor as follows:
(1) Two employees of a local mentoring or youth development nonprofit
organization representing different counties.
(2) Two participants between the ages of 14 and 18 who are in the mentorship
program. Students must apply to the position and be recommended by local
school officials.
(3) Two representatives of the Department of Public Instruction.
(4) Two representatives of the business community.
(5) Two representatives of philanthropic communities.
(6) Two public school instructors representing different counties.
*H726-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Terms and Chair. – Non-student members shall serve three-year terms, with no
prohibition against being reappointed. Any individual appointed to serve on the Commission
shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The Commission shall elect a
chair and vice-chair from its membership to serve a term of one year. No person may serve as
chairperson for more than two consecutive years. Students are to be selected for one-year terms.
(d) Meetings. – The chair shall convene the meetings of the Commission. Meetings shall
be held as often as necessary but not less than two times per year.
(e) Quorum. – A majority of the members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at
meetings of the Commission shall be necessary for action to be taken by the Commission.
(f) Vacancies. – A vacancy on the Commission or as chair of the Commission resulting
from the resignation of a member or otherwise shall be filled in the same manner in which the
original appointment was made, and the term shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.
(g) Removal. – The Governor may remove a member for misfeasance, malfeasance,
nonfeasance, or neglect of duty.
(h) Compensation. – Excluding salaried youth mentors, commission members shall
receive no per diem for their services but shall be entitled to receive travel allowances in
accordance with the provisions of G.S. 138-5 or G.S. 138-6, as appropriate.
(i) Staffing. – The Secretary of the Department of Administration shall be responsible
for staffing the Commission. In choosing student members, the Secretary must consult with
respective school districts.
(j) Grant Program. – Programs shall consist of individuals who are responsible for youth
guidance. If possible, at least three-fifths of those employed in a nonadministrative capacity shall
be below 30 years of age and from the same county they are assigned. Programs shall consist of
academic tutoring for core subjects. Activities should also consist of enrichment opportunities,
as determined by the Commission. Funding for the grant program shall come from the State
Education Lottery.
(k) Reports. – The Commission shall provide an annual report on or before December 1
on the distributions of the grants to the chairs of the House Appropriations Committee on General
Government, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on General Government and
Information Technology, and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the
following:
(1) The number of organizations that applied for grants.
(2) The amount of grant funds awarded and the names of the recipients.
(3) The balance of funds remaining.
(4) The improved academic performance of participants in the program.
(l) Funding for Commission. – From funds available to the Department of
Administration, the Secretary shall allocate monies to fund the work of the Commission."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 726-First Edition